Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Certificate of Need Program

Law reviews.

For article, “Contracting to Preserve Open Science: Consideration-Based Regulation in Patent Law,” see 58 Emory L.J. 889 (2009).

31-6-40.
Certificate of need required for new institutional health services; exemption.

On and after July 1, 2008, any new institutional health service shall be required to obtain a certificate of need pursuant to this chapter. New institutional health services include:

The construction, development, or other establishment of a new, expanded, or relocated health care facility, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 31-6-47;

Any expenditure by or on behalf of a health care facility in excess of $10 million which, under generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, is a capital expenditure, except expenditures for acquisition of an existing health care facility. The dollar amounts specified in this paragraph and in paragraph (14) of Code Section 31-6-2 shall be adjusted annually by an amount calculated by multiplying such dollar amounts (as adjusted for the preceding year) by the annual percentage of change in the composite index of construction material prices, or its successor or appropriate replacement index, if any, published by the United States Department of Commerce for the preceding calendar year, commencing on July 1, 2019, and on each anniversary thereafter of publication of the index. The department shall immediately institute rule-making procedures to adopt such adjusted dollar amounts. In calculating the dollar amounts of a proposed project for purposes of this paragraph and paragraph (14) of Code Section 31-6-2, the costs of all items subject to review by this chapter and items not subject to review by this chapter associated with and simultaneously developed or proposed with the project shall be counted, except for the expenditure or commitment of or incurring an obligation for the expenditure of funds to develop certificate of need applications, studies, reports, schematics, preliminary plans and specifications or working drawings, or to acquire sites;

The purchase or lease by or on behalf of a health care facility or a diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitation center of diagnostic or therapeutic equipment, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 31-6-47;

Any increase in the bed capacity of a health care facility except as provided in Code Section 31-6-47;

Clinical health services which are offered in or through a health care facility, which were not offered on a regular basis in or through such health care facility within the 12 month period prior to the time such services would be offered;

Any conversion or upgrading of any general acute care hospital to a specialty hospital or of a facility such that it is converted from a type of facility not covered by this chapter to any of the types of health care facilities which are covered by this chapter;

Clinical health services which are offered in or through a diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitation center which were not offered on a regular basis in or through that center within the 12 month period prior to the time such services would be offered, but only if the clinical health services are any of the following:

Radiation therapy;

Biliary lithotripsy;

Surgery in an operating room environment, including but not limited to ambulatory surgery; and

Cardiac catheterization; and

The conversion of a destination cancer hospital to a general cancer hospital.

Any person proposing to develop or offer a new institutional health service or health care facility shall, before commencing such activity, submit a letter of intent and an application to the department and obtain a certificate of need in the manner provided in this chapter unless such activity is excluded from the scope of this chapter.

Any person who had a valid exemption granted or approved by the former Health Planning Agency or the department prior to July 1, 2008, shall not be required to obtain a certificate of need in order to continue to offer those previously offered services.

Any facility offering ambulatory surgery pursuant to the exclusion designated on June 30, 2008, as division (14)(G)(iii) of Code Section 31-6-2; any diagnostic, treatment, or rehabilitation center offering diagnostic imaging or other imaging services in operation and exempt prior to July 1, 2008; or any facility operating pursuant to a letter of nonreviewability and offering diagnostic imaging services prior to July 1, 2008, shall:

Provide annual reports in the same manner and in accordance with Code Section 31-6-70; and

Provide care to Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, to PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries and provide uncompensated indigent and charity care in an amount equal to or greater than 2 percent of its adjusted gross revenue; or

If the facility is not a participant in Medicaid or the PeachCare for Kids Program, provide uncompensated care for Medicaid beneficiaries and, if the facility provides medical care and treatment to children, for PeachCare for Kids beneficiaries, uncompensated indigent and charity care, or both in an amount equal to or greater than 4 percent of its adjusted gross revenue if it:

Makes a capital expenditure associated with the construction, development, expansion, or other establishment of a clinical health service or the acquisition or replacement of diagnostic or therapeutic equipment with a value in excess of $800,000.00 over a two-year period;

Builds a new operating room; or

Chooses to relocate in accordance with Code Section 31-6-47.

Noncompliance with any condition of this paragraph shall result in a monetary penalty in the amount of the difference between the services which the center is required to provide and the amount actually provided and may be subject to revocation of its exemption status by the department for repeated failure to pay any fees or moneys due to the department or for repeated failure to produce data as required by Code Section 31-6-70 after notice to the exemption holder and a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The dollar amount specified in this paragraph shall be adjusted annually by an amount calculated by multiplying such dollar amount (as adjusted for the preceding year) by the annual percentage of change in the consumer price index, or its successor or appropriate replacement index, if any, published by the United States Department of Labor for the preceding calendar year, commencing on July 1, 2009. In calculating the dollar amounts of a proposed project for the purposes of this paragraph, the costs of all items subject to review by this chapter and items not subject to review by this chapter associated with and simultaneously developed or proposed with the project shall be counted, except for the expenditure or commitment of or incurring an obligation for the expenditure of funds to develop certificate of need applications, studies, reports, schematics, preliminary plans and specifications or working drawings, or to acquire sites. Subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall not apply to facilities offering ophthalmic ambulatory surgery pursuant to the exclusion designated on June 30, 2008, as division (14)(G)(iii) of Code Section 31-6-2 that are owned by physicians in the practice of ophthalmology.

A certificate of need issued to a destination cancer hospital shall authorize the beds and all new institutional health services of such destination cancer hospital. As used in this subsection, the term “new institutional health service” shall have the same meaning provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section. A certificate of need shall only be issued to a destination cancer hospital that locates itself and all affiliated facilities within 25 miles of a commercial airport in this state with five or more runways. Such destination cancer hospital shall not be required to apply for or obtain additional certificates of need for new institutional health services related to the treatment of cancer patients, and such new institutional health services related to the treatment of cancer patients offered by the destination cancer hospital shall not be reviewed under any service-specific need methodology or rules except for those promulgated by the department for destination cancer hospitals. After commencing operations, in order to add an additional new institutional health service, a destination cancer hospital shall apply for and obtain an additional certificate of need under the applicable statutory provisions and any rules promulgated by the department for destination cancer hospitals, and such applications shall only be granted if the patient base of such destination cancer hospital is composed of at least 65 percent of out-of-state patients for two consecutive years. The department may apply rules for a destination cancer hospital only for those services that the department determines are to be used by the destination cancer hospital in connection with the treatment of cancer. In no case shall destination cancer hospital specific rules be used in the case of an application for open heart surgery, perinatal services, cardiac catheterization, and other services deemed by the department to be not reasonably related to the diagnosis and treatment of cancer; provided, however, that the department shall apply the destination cancer hospital specific rules if a destination cancer hospital applies for services and equipment required for it to meet federal or state laws applicable to a hospital. If such destination cancer hospital cannot show a patient base of a minimum of 65 percent from outside of this state, then its application for any new institutional health service shall be evaluated under the specific statutes and rules applicable to that particular service. If such destination cancer hospital applies for a certificate of need to add an additional new institutional health service before commencing operations or completing two consecutive years of operation, such applicant may rely on historical data from its affiliated entities, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (b.1) of Code Section 31-6-42. Because destination cancer hospitals provide services primarily to out-of-state residents, the number of beds, services, and equipment destination cancer hospitals use shall not be counted as part of the department’s inventory when determining the need for those items by other providers. No person shall be issued more than one certificate of need for a destination cancer hospital. Nothing in this Code section shall in any way require a destination cancer hospital to obtain a certificate of need for any purpose that is otherwise exempt from the certificate of need requirement. Beginning January 1, 2010, the department shall not accept any application for a certificate of need for a new destination cancer hospital; provided, however, all other provisions regarding the upgrading, replacing, or purchasing of diagnostic or therapeutic equipment shall be applicable to an existing destination cancer hospital.

The commissioner shall be authorized, with the approval of the board, to place a temporary moratorium of up to six months on the issuance of certificates of need for new and emerging health care services. Any such moratorium placed shall be for the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations regarding such new and emerging health care services. A moratorium may be extended one time for an additional three months if circumstances warrant, as approved by the board. In the event that final rules and regulations are not promulgated within the time period allowed by the moratorium, any applications received by the department for a new and emerging health care service shall be reviewed under existing general statutes and regulations relating to certificates of need.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1871, § 6; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-4/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a); deleted former subparagraph (c)(2)(A), which read: “Provide notice to the department of the name, ownership, location, single specialty, and services provided in the exempt facility;”; substituted “(A) Provide” for “(B) Beginning on January 1, 2009, provide”; redesignated former subparagraph (c)(2)(C) as present subparagraph (c)(2)(B); and substituted “Subparagraph (B)” for “Subparagraph (C)” at the beginning of the last sentence of the undesignated paragraph of subparagraph (c)(2)(B).

Cross references.

Licensed hospice exempt from certificate of need requirement, §

31-7-179

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “a” was deleted following “no case shall” in the seventh sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1990, p. 970), the General Assembly directed the State Health Planning Agency to make certain studies and reports and to update its rules and regulations.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 03.20.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2018).

For article with annual survey on administrative law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2021).

31-6-40.1.
Acquisition of health care facilities; penalty for failure to notify department; limitation on applications; agreement to care for indigent patients; requirements for destination cancer hospitals; notice and hearing provisions for penalties authorized.

Any person who acquires a health care facility by stock or asset purchase, merger, consolidation, or other lawful means shall notify the department of such acquisition, the date thereof, and the name and address of the acquiring person. Such notification shall be made in writing to the department within 45 days following the acquisition and the acquiring person may be fined by the department in the amount of $500.00 for each day that such notification is late. Such fine shall be paid into the state treasury.

The department may limit the time periods during which it will accept applications for the following health care facilities:

Skilled nursing facilities;

Intermediate care facilities; and

Home health agencies,

to only such times after the department has determined there is an unmet need for such facilities. The department shall make a determination as to whether or not there is an unmet need for each type of facility at least every six months and shall notify those requesting such notification of that determination.

The department may require that any applicant for a certificate of need agree to provide a specified amount of clinical health services to indigent patients as a condition for the grant of a certificate of need; provided, however, that each facility granted a certificate of need by the department as a destination cancer hospital shall be required to provide uncompensated indigent or charity care for residents of Georgia which meets or exceeds 3 percent of such destination cancer hospital’s adjusted gross revenues and provide care to Medicaid beneficiaries. A grantee or successor in interest of a certificate of need or an authorization to operate under this chapter which violates such an agreement or violates any conditions imposed by the department relating to such services, whether made before or after July 1, 2008, shall be liable to the department for a monetary penalty in the amount of the difference between the amount of services so agreed to be provided and the amount actually provided and may be subject to revocation of its certificate of need, in whole or in part, by the department pursuant to Code Section 31-6-45. Any penalty so recovered shall be paid into the state treasury.

(c.1) (1)

A destination cancer hospital that does not meet an annual patient base composed of a minimum of 65 percent of patients who reside outside this state in a calendar year shall be fined $2 million for the first year of noncompliance, $4 million for the second consecutive year of noncompliance, and $6 million for the third consecutive year of noncompliance. Such fine amount shall reset to $2 million after any year of compliance. In the event that a destination cancer hospital does not meet an annual patient base composed of a minimum of 65 percent of patients who reside outside this state for three calendar years in any five-year period, such hospital shall be fined an additional amount of $8 million. It is the intent of the General Assembly that all revenues collected from any such fines shall be dedicated and deposited by the department into the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152.

Penalties authorized under this Code section shall be subject to the same notices and hearing for the levy of fines under Code Section 31-6-45.

(2)

In the event a certificate of need for a destination cancer hospital is revoked pursuant to this subsection, such hospital shall be subject to fines pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 31-6-45 for operating without a certificate of need.

(3)

In addition to the annual report required pursuant to Code Section 31-6-70, a destination cancer hospital shall submit an annual statement, in accordance with timeframes and a format specified by the department, affirming that the hospital has met an annual patient base composed of a minimum of 65 percent of patients who reside outside this state. The chief executive officer of the destination cancer hospital shall certify under penalties of perjury that the statement as prepared accurately reflects the composition of the annual patient base. The department shall have the authority to inspect any books, records, papers, or other information pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 31-6-45 of the destination cancer hospital to confirm the information provided on such statement or any other information required of the destination cancer hospital. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require the release of any information which would violate the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-40.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1419, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-5/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted former subsection (b.1), which read: “The department may establish, by rule, set times during the year in which applications for capital projects exceeding the threshold amounts in:

“(1) Paragraph (14) of Code Section 31-6-2; and

“(2) Paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-6-40 shall be accepted.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

31-6-40.2.
New perinatal services.

As used in this Code section only, the term:

“Certificate of need application” means an application for a certificate of need filed with the department, any amendments thereto, and any other written material relating to the application and filed by the applicant with the department.

“First three years of operation” means the first three consecutive 12 month periods beginning on the first day of a new perinatal service’s first full calendar month of operation.

“First year of operation” means the first consecutive 12 month period beginning on the first day of a new perinatal service’s first full calendar month of operation.

“New perinatal service” means a perinatal service whose first year of operation ends after April 6, 1992.

“Perinatal service” means obstetric and neonatal services relating to managing high-risk pregnancies, care for moderately ill newborns, care for all maternal and fetal complications either on site or by referral, and operation of neonatal intensive care units equipped to treat critically ill newborns; provided however, this shall not include basic perinatal services as defined in Code Section 31-6-2.

“Year” means one of the three consecutive 12 month periods in a new perinatal service’s first 36 months of operation.

A new perinatal service shall provide uncompensated indigent or charity care in an amount which meets or exceeds the department’s established minimum at the time the department issued the certificate of need approval for such service for each of the service’s first three years of operation; provided, however, that if the certificate of need application under which a new perinatal service was approved included a commitment that uncompensated indigent or charity care would be provided in an amount greater than the established minimum for any time period described in the certificate of need application that falls completely within such new perinatal service’s first three years of operation, such new perinatal service shall provide indigent or charity care in an amount which meets or exceeds the amount committed in the certificate of need application for each time period described in the certificate of need application that falls completely within the service’s first three years of operation.

The department shall revoke the certificate of need and authority to operate of a new perinatal service if after notice to the grantee of the certificate or such grantee’s successors, and after opportunity for a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the department determines that such new perinatal service has failed to provide indigent or charity care in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection and such failure is determined by the department to be for reasons substantially within the perinatal service provider’s control. The department shall provide the requisite notice, conduct the fair hearing, if requested, and render its determination within 90 days after the end of the first year, or, if applicable, the first time period described in paragraph (1) of this subsection during which the new perinatal service fails to provide indigent or charity care in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection. Revocation shall be effective 30 days after the date of the determination by the department that the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection have not been met.

A new perinatal service shall achieve the standard number of births specified in the state health plan in effect at the time of the issuance of the certificate of need approval by the department in at least one year during its first three years of operation.

The department shall revoke the certificate of need and authority to operate of a new perinatal service if after notice to the grantee of the certificate of need or such grantee’s successors, and after opportunity for a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the department determines that such new perinatal service has failed to comply with the applicable requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection and such failure is determined by the department to be for reasons substantially within the perinatal service provider’s control. The department shall provide the requisite notice, conduct the fair hearing, if requested, and render its determination within 90 days after the end of the new perinatal service’s first three years of operation. Revocation shall be effective 30 days after the date of the determination by the department that the requirements of this paragraph or paragraph (1) of this subsection have not been met.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall limit the department’s authority to regulate perinatal services in ways or for time periods not addressed by the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-40.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1068, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “April 6, 1992” was substituted for “the date this Code Section becomes effective” in paragraph (a)(4), and “this paragraph or paragraph (1)” was substituted for “paragraph (1) or (2)” in the last sentence of paragraph (c)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “service’s” was substituted for “service” in paragraph (a)(6).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 enactment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 265 (1992).

31-6-40.3.
Conversion of destination cancer hospital to general cancer hospital; procedure; requirements.

On and after July 1, 2019, a destination cancer hospital may apply for a certificate of need to convert to a general cancer hospital in accordance with this Code section. A destination cancer hospital that elects to convert to a general cancer hospital shall notify the department in a form and manner established by the department.

The department shall establish a form and process for a destination cancer hospital to submit a certificate of need application to convert to a general cancer hospital; provided, however, that such a conversion shall not be subject to any of the considerations in Code Section 31-6-42 or service specific rules and shall not be subject to opposition or appeal by any other health care facilities. The department shall develop such form and guidance required by this subsection within 30 days of July 1, 2019. Upon its receipt of a complete application for a destination cancer hospital to convert to a general cancer hospital, the department shall issue such certificate of need within 60 days.

Upon the conversion of a destination cancer hospital to a general cancer hospital:

The general cancer hospital may continue to provide all institutional health care services and other services it provided as of the date of such conversion, including but not limited to inpatient beds, outpatient services, surgery, radiation therapy, imaging, and positron emission tomography (PET) scanning, without any further approval from the department;

The destination cancer hospital shall be classified as a general cancer hospital under this chapter and shall be subject to all requirements and conditions applicable to hospitals under this article, including but not limited to, indigent and charity care and inventories and methodologies to determine need for additional providers or services; and

The hospital’s inpatient beds, operating rooms, radiation therapy equipment, and imaging equipment existing on the date of conversion shall not be counted in the inventory by the department for purposes of determining need for additional providers or services, except that any inpatient beds, operating rooms, radiation therapy equipment, and imaging equipment added after the date of conversion shall be counted in accordance with the department’s rules and regulations.

In the event that a destination cancer hospital does not convert to a general cancer hospital, it shall remain subject to all requirements and conditions applicable to destination cancer hospitals under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-40.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-6/HB 186.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “July 1, 2019” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act” at the end of the second sentence in subsection (b).

31-6-41.
Scope and term of validity of certificate.

A certificate of need shall be valid only for the defined scope, location, cost, service area, and person named in an application, as it may be amended, and as such scope, location, service area, cost, and person are approved by the department, unless such certificate of need owned by an existing health care facility is transferred to a person who acquires such existing facility. In such case, the certificate of need shall be valid for the person who acquires such a facility and for the scope, location, cost, and service area approved by the department. However, in reviewing an application to relocate all or a portion of an existing skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or intermingled nursing facility, the department may allow such facility to divide into two or more such facilities if the department determines that the proposed division is financially feasible and would be consistent with quality patient care.

A certificate of need shall be valid and effective for a period of 12 months after it is issued, or such greater period of time as may be specified by the department at the time the certificate of need is issued. Within the effective period after the grant of a certificate of need, the applicant of a proposed project shall fulfill reasonable performance and scheduling requirements specified by the department, by rule, to assure reasonable progress toward timely completion of a project.

By rule, the department may provide for extension of the effective period of a certificate of need when an applicant, by petition, makes a good faith showing that the conditions to be specified according to subsection (b) of this Code section will be performed within the extended period and that the reasons for the extension are beyond the control of the applicant.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.